Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.030

Administration and improvement of certain motor vehicle laws.

The department is responsible for administering and recommending the improvement of the motor vehicle laws of this state relating to:

(1) Driver examining and licensing;

(2) Driver improvement;

(3) Driver records;

(4) Financial responsibility;

(5) Certificates of title;

(6) Vehicle registration certificates and license plates;

(7) Proration and reciprocity;

(8) Liquid fuel tax collections;

(9) Licensing of dealers, motor vehicle transporters, motor vehicle wreckers, for hire vehicles, and drivers' schools;

(10) General highway safety promotion in cooperation with the Washington state patrol and traffic safety commission; and

(11) Such other activities as the legislature may provide.

[ 2010 c 161 s 1107; 1990 c 250 s 14; 1965 c 156 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.